Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5241.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 241c. (1) Beginning October 1, 2017, the department or a state agency may not enter into a contract with a person for the construction, alteration, or repair of a state building or other state property unless the contract includes a representation that the person is not currently engaged in, and an agreement that the person will not engage in, the boycott of a person based in or doing business with a strategic partner. (2) In addition to subsection (1), beginning January 1, 2026, the department or a state agency may not enter into a contract with a person unless the contract includes a representation that the person is not currently engaged in, and an agreement that the person will not engage in, the boycott of a person that is involved in the conventional production of energy or the mining, agriculture, timber, or firearms industries. (3) (2) As used in this section, "boycott", "person", and "strategic partner" mean those terms as defined in section 261.